Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2007.01
Uniform Reciprocal Transfer Tax Act; inheritance tax; when payable.

The tax imposed by Chapter 77, article 20, in respect of personal property (except tangible personal property having an actual situs in this state) shall not be payable (1) if the decedent is a resident of a state or territory of the United States which at the time of the transfer did not impose a transfer tax or death tax of any character in respect of personal property of residents of this state (except tangible personal property having an actual situs in such state or territory), or (2) if the laws of the state or territory of residence of the decedent at the time of the transfer contained a reciprocal provision under which nonresidents were exempted from transfer taxes or death taxes of every character in respect of personal property (except tangible personal property having an actual situs therein) provided the state or territory of residence of such nonresidents allowed a similar exemption to residents of the state or territory of residence of such decedent. For the purposes of this section the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and the Philippine Islands shall be considered territories of the United States.

Laws 1951, c. 254, § 1, p. 875.

Nebraska's version of the Uniform Reciprocal Transfer Tax Act does not limit the exemption to cases in which the decedent's resident state has imposed a tax on the transfer of the property exempted. In re Estate of Holt, 246 Neb. 50, 516 N.W.2d 608 (1994).